Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-501
Act,
how cited.

Sections 54-501 to 54-508 shall be known and may
be cited as the Food Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive Program Act.

Laws
2008, LB1172, § 1.